hu: Egérport típusa: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Vezeték nélküli USB; Egyéb
fi: Hiiriporttityyppi: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Langaton USB; Muu
lt-LT: Pelės prievado tipas: „Bluetooth“; PS/2; USB; Belaidė USB; Kita
ko: 마우스 포트 유형: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; 무선 USB; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta vrat za miško: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Brezžični USB; Drugo
fr: Type de port de la souris: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; USB sans fil; Autre
vi: Loại cổng cắm chuột: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; USB không dây; Khác
nl: Muispoorttype: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Draadloze USB; Andere
th: ประเภทพอร์ตเมาส์: บลูทูธ; PS/2; USB; ยูเอสบีแบบไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
ja: マウスポートタイプ: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; ワイヤレスUSB; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de porta de rato: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; USB sem fios; Outro
zh-TW: 滑鼠連接埠類型: 藍牙; 個人電腦連接埠; USB; 無線 USB; 其他
nb: Type museport: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Trådløs USB; Annet
de: Mausporttyp: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; USB Kabellos; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип порт за мишка: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Безжичен USB; Други
hr-HR: Tip ulaza za miš: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Bežični USB; Ostalo
zh-CN: 鼠标端口类型: 蓝牙; PS/2; USB; 无线 USB; 其他
it: Tipo di porta del mouse: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; USB senza fili; Altro
cs: Typ portu pro myš: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Bezdrátové USB; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ portu myši: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Bezdrôtové USB; Iné
en: Mouse port type: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Wireless USB; Other
tr: Fare Bağlantı Noktası Türü: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Kablosuz USB; Diğer
el: Τύπος θύρας ποντικιού: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Ασύρματο USB; Άλλο
da: Museporttype: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Trådløs USB; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de porta do mouse: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; USB sem fio; Outro
pl: Typ portu myszy: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Bezprzewodowe USB; Inne
es: Tipo de puerto del ratón: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; USB inalámbrico; Otros
sv: Typ av musport: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Trådlös USB; Övrigt
ru: Тип порта мыши: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; Беспроводной USB; Другой
ro-RO: Tipul portului pentru mouse: Bluetooth; PS/2; USB; USB fără fir; Altele